Mississippi, session 2026, HB1221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created the Mississippi Jenna's Law Task Force to review and make recommendations regarding the need for coroners to list Sudden Unexpected Death in Epilepsy Patients (SUDEP) as a cause of death, and to study the feasibility of requiring coroners to report any such deaths to the National SUDEP Registry. (2)  The task force shall be composed of the following members: (a)  The Mississippi State Medical Examiner, or his or her designee; (b)  The President of the Mississippi Coroners & Medical Examiner Association, or his or her designee; (c)  President of the Mississippi Sheriffs' Association, or his or her designee; (d)  Chair of the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Epilepsy Foundation, or his or her designee; (e)  State Health Office of the Mississippi Department of Health, or his or her designee; (3)  The duties of the task force shall include the following: (a)  Study the existence of Sudden Unexpected Death in Epilepsy Patients (SUDEP) as a cause of death; (b)  Examine the incidence or SUDEP as a cause of death; (c)  Compare the number of deaths in this state and those listed on the National SUDEP Registry; (d)  Provide recommendations to the Legislature regarding any duties of coroners to report such deaths; and (4)  (a)  Appointments to the task force shall be made within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act.  Within fifteen (15) days thereafter on a day to be designated jointly by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor, the task force shall meet and organize by selecting from its membership a chair and a vice chair.  The vice chair shall also serve as secretary and shall be responsible for keeping all records of the task force. A majority of the members of the task force shall constitute a quorum.  In the selection of its officers and the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, an affirmative vote of a majority of the task force shall be required.  All members shall be notified in writing of all meetings, and those notices shall be mailed at least fifteen (15) days before the date on which a meeting is to be held. (b)  The task force shall meet at least once each month and provide monthly reports to the Legislature on its activities. (c)  The task force shall make a final report of its findings and recommendations, including any recommended legislation, to the Legislature not later than December 1, 2027, at which time the task force will be dissolved. (5)  Members of the task force shall receive no compensation for their service on the task force, but may receive reimbursement for mileage and actual expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41, to the extent that funds are available for that purpose. (6)  The Mississippi Department of Education shall provide the staff and other support necessary for the task force to perform its duties. (7)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, any department, division, board, bureau, committee, institution or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, shall, at the request of the chairman of the task force, provide the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the task force to carry out its duties. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.